Washington statutes.
RCW 6.36.150

Satisfaction of judgment.

Satisfaction, either partial or complete, of the original judgment or of a judgment entered thereupon in any other state shall operate to the same extent as satisfaction of the judgment in this state, except as to costs authorized by RCW 6.36.140.

[ 1953 c 191 s 15.]